Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1405
Remedies; administration and enforcement; duty to mitigate damages.

(1) The remedies provided by the Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act shall be so administered that the aggrieved party may recover appropriate damages. The aggrieved party has a duty to mitigate damages.

(2) Any right or obligation declared by the Uniform Residential Landlord and Tenant Act is enforceable by action unless the provision declaring it specifies a different and limited effect.

Laws 1974, LB 293, § 5;

Laws 2001, LB 7, § 4.